Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2124.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin COMMUNITY CULTURAL EVENTS AND ENGAGEMENT; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for the Office of Justice Programs to issue a grant to the Ramsey County Sheriff's Office. Grant money must be used to provide security or other safety services at cultural events within Ramsey County and for peace officers to participate in culturally informed community engagement. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end